Indiana, session 2026, HB1022.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-8-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.40-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A political party shall conduct a state
convention to nominate the candidates of the political party for the
following offices to be voted on at the next general election:
(1) Lieutenant governor.
(2) (1) Secretary of state.
(3) (2) State comptroller (auditor of state).
(4) (3) Treasurer of state.
(5) (4) Attorney general.
(b) The convention may also:
(1) nominate candidates for presidential electors and alternate
presidential electors; and
(2) elect the delegates and alternate delegates to the national
convention of the political party.
(c) If a political party's state convention does not:
(1) nominate candidates for presidential electors and alternate
2026 IN 1022—LS 6288/DI 149


presidential electors; or
(2) elect the delegates and alternate delegates to the national
convention of the political party;
the candidates shall be nominated or the delegates elected as provided
in the state party's rules.
SECTION 2. IC 3-8-7-25, AS AMENDED BY P.L.169-2015,
SECTION 66, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 25. Each county election board shall have printed
on the respective general, special, or municipal election ballots the
names of the following candidates:
(1) Nominees chosen at a primary election under IC 3-10 and
certified as required by this chapter.
(2) Nominees chosen by a convention of a political party in the
state whose candidate received at least two percent (2%) of the
total vote cast for secretary of state at the last election and
certified under section 8 of this chapter.
(3) Candidates for lieutenant governor who:
(A) are timely certified under section 31 to run jointly with
a candidate for governor; and
(B) timely file a declaration of candidacy under section 31
of this chapter.
(3) (4) Nominees nominated by petition under IC 3-8-6.
(4) (5) Nominees selected to fill a candidate vacancy under
IC 3-13-1 or IC 3-13-2.
SECTION 3. IC 3-8-7-31, IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 31. (a) Not later than noon July 15 before the general
election, a candidate for governor who has been nominated as a
candidate of a political party at a primary election or a state
convention under IC 3-8-4-10 shall certify in writing to the
secretary of state the name of the candidate for lieutenant
governor who will run jointly with the candidate for governor in
the general election.
(b) Not later than noon July 15 before the general election, the
candidate for lieutenant governor identified in subsection (a) shall
file with the secretary of state a declaration of candidacy signed
before a person authorized to administer oaths that contains the
following information:
(1) The candidate's name, printed or typewritten as:
(A) the candidate wants the candidate's name to appear on
the ballot; and
(B) the candidate's name is permitted to appear on the
2026 IN 1022—LS 6288/DI 149


ballot under IC 3-5-7.
A candidate must specify, by a designation described in
IC 3-5-7-5, each designation that the candidate wants to use
that is permitted by IC 3-5-7.
(2) A statement that the candidate is a registered voter and
the location of the candidate's precinct and township (or
ward, if applicable, and city or town), county, and state.
(3) The candidate's complete residence address, and if the
candidate's mailing address is different from the residence
address, the mailing address.
(4) A statement of the candidate's party affiliation. For
purposes of this subdivision, a candidate is considered to be
affiliated with a political party only if any of the following
applies:
(A) The two (2) most recent primary elections in Indiana
in which the candidate voted were primary elections held
by the party with which the candidate claims affiliation. If
the candidate cast a nonpartisan ballot at an election held
at either of the two (2) most recent primary elections in
which the candidate voted, a certification by the county
chairman under clause (B) is required.
(B) The county chairman of:
(i) the political party with which the candidate claims
affiliation; and
(ii) the county in which the candidate resides;
certifies that the candidate is a member of the political
party.
The declaration of candidacy must inform candidates how
party affiliation is determined under this subdivision and
permit the candidate to indicate on the declaration of
candidacy which of clauses (A) or (B) applies to the candidate.
If a candidate claims party affiliation under clause (B), the
candidate must attach to the candidate's declaration of
candidacy the written certification of the county chairman
required by clause (B).
(5) A statement that the candidate complies with all
requirements under the laws of Indiana to be a candidate for
the above named office, including any applicable residency
requirements, and that the candidate is not ineligible to be a
candidate due to a criminal conviction that would prohibit the
candidate from serving in the office.
(6) A request that the candidate's name be placed on the
2026 IN 1022—LS 6288/DI 149


general election ballot as a candidate for lieutenant governor
jointly with the candidate for governor, and the date of the
general election.
(7) The following statements:
(A) A statement that the candidate has attached either of
the following to the declaration:
(i) A copy of a statement of economic interests, file
stamped by the office required to receive the statement
of economic interests.
(ii) A receipt or photocopy of a receipt showing that a
statement of economic interests has been filed.
(B) A statement that the candidate understands that if the
candidate is elected to the office, the candidate may be
required to obtain and file an individual surety bond
before serving in the office.
(C) A statement that the candidate:
(i) is aware of the provisions of IC 3-9 regarding
campaign finance and the reporting of campaign
contributions and expenditures; and
(ii) agrees to comply with the provisions of IC 3-9.
The candidate must separately initial each of the statements
required by this subdivision.
(8) A statement as to whether the candidate has been a
candidate for state, legislative, or local office in a previous
primary, municipal, special, or general election and whether
the candidate has filed all reports required by IC 3-9-5-10 for
all previous candidacies.
(9) If the candidate is subject to IC 3-9-1-5, a statement that
the candidate has filed a campaign finance statement of
organization for the candidate's principal committee or is
aware that the candidate may be required to file a campaign
finance statement of organization not later than noon seven
(7) days after the final date to file a declaration of candidacy
under this section.
(10) The candidate's signature.
(c) The election division shall provide that the form of a
declaration of candidacy includes the following information:
(1) The dates for filing campaign finance reports under
IC 3-9.
(2) The penalties for late filing of campaign finance reports
under IC 3-9.
(d) A declaration of candidacy must include a statement that the
2026 IN 1022—LS 6288/DI 149


candidate requests the name on the candidate's voter registration
record be the same as the name the candidate uses on the
declaration of candidacy. If there is a difference between the name
on the candidate's declaration of candidacy and the name on the
candidate's voter registration record, the officer with whom the
declaration of candidacy is filed shall forward the information to
the voter registration officer of the appropriate county as required
by IC 3-5-7-6(d). The voter registration officer of the appropriate
county shall change the name on the candidate's voter registration
record to be the same as the name on the candidate's declaration
of candidacy.
(e) Notwithstanding IC 3-13-1-7, if:
(1) the candidate for governor fails to timely certify a
candidate for lieutenant governor as required under
subsection (a); or
(2) a candidate for lieutenant governor fails to timely file the
declaration of candidacy under subsection (b);
the lieutenant governor candidate vacancy must be filled, not later
than August 15 before the general election, by the state committee
of the political party under IC 3-13-1.
SECTION 4. IC 3-9-1-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) This section does not apply
to the following candidates:
(1) A candidate for a local office for which the compensation is
less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per year.
(2) A candidate for a school board office.
(b) Each candidate shall have a principal committee.
(c) A candidate shall file a written instrument designating the name
of the principal committee and the names of the chairman and treasurer
of the committee. The written instrument must be filed not later than
the earliest of the following:
(1) Noon ten (10) days after becoming a candidate.
(2) Noon seven (7) days after the final date and hour for filing any
of the following, whichever applies to the candidate:
(A) A declaration of candidacy under IC 3-8-2 or IC 3-8-7-31.
(B) A petition of nomination under IC 3-8-6.
(C) A certificate of nomination under IC 3-8-7-8.
(D) A certificate of candidate selection under IC 3-13-1 or
IC 3-13-2.
(E) A declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate under
IC 3-8-2.
(3) The date a candidate is required to file the candidate's first
2026 IN 1022—LS 6288/DI 149


campaign finance report under IC 3-9-5.
(d) This designation may be made on the same instrument as the
statement of organization required from the principal committee.
SECTION 5. IC 4-2-6-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The following persons shall file a written
financial disclosure statement:
(1) The governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state
comptroller, treasurer of state, and attorney general.
(2) Any candidate for one (1) of the offices in subdivision (1) who
is not the holder of one (1) of those offices.
(3) Any person who is the appointing authority of an agency.
(4) The director of each division of the Indiana department of
administration.
(5) Any purchasing agent within the procurement division of the
Indiana department of administration.
(6) Any agency employee, special state appointee, former agency
employee, or former special state appointee with final purchasing
authority.
(7) The chief investment officer employed by the Indiana public
retirement system.
(8) Any employee of the Indiana public retirement system whose
duties include the recommendation, selection, and management
of:
(A) the investments of the funds administered by the Indiana
public retirement system;
(B) the investment options offered in the annuity savings
accounts in the public employees' retirement fund and the
Indiana state teachers' retirement fund;
(C) the investment options offered in the legislators' defined
contribution plan; or
(D) investment managers, investment advisors, and other
investment service providers of the Indiana public retirement
system.
(9) An employee required to do so by rule adopted by the
inspector general.
(b) The statement shall be filed with the inspector general as
follows:
(1) Not later than February 1 of every year, in the case of the state
officers and employees enumerated in subsection (a).
(2) If the individual has not previously filed under subdivision (1)
during the present calendar year and is filing as a candidate for a
2026 IN 1022—LS 6288/DI 149


state office listed in subsection (a)(1), before:
(A) filing a declaration of candidacy under IC 3-8-2, or
IC 3-8-4-11, or IC 3-8-7-31;
(B) filing a petition of nomination under IC 3-8-6; or
(C) filing a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate
under IC 3-8-2-2.5; or
(D) before a certificate of nomination is filed under IC 3-8-7-8,
in the case of a candidate for one (1) of the state offices
(unless the statement has already been filed when required
under IC 3-8-4-11).
(3) Not later than sixty (60) days after employment or taking
office, unless the previous employment or office required the
filing of a statement under this section.
(4) Not later than thirty (30) days after leaving employment or
office, unless the subsequent employment or office requires the
filing of a statement under this section.
The statement must be made under affirmation.
(c) The statement shall set forth the following information for the
preceding calendar year or, in the case of a state officer or employee
who leaves office or employment, the period since a previous statement
was filed:
(1) The name and address of any person known:
(A) to have a business relationship with the agency of the state
officer or employee or the office sought by the candidate; and
(B) from whom the state officer, candidate, or the employee,
or that individual's spouse or unemancipated children received
a gift or gifts having a total fair market value in excess of one
hundred dollars ($100).
(2) The location of all real property in which the state officer,
candidate, or the employee or that individual's spouse or
unemancipated children has an equitable or legal interest either
amounting to five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more or
comprising ten percent (10%) of the state officer's, candidate's, or
the employee's net worth or the net worth of that individual's
spouse or unemancipated children. An individual's primary
personal residence need not be listed, unless it also serves as
income property.
(3) The names and the nature of the business of the employers of
the state officer, candidate, or the employee and that individual's
spouse.
(4) The following information about any sole proprietorship
owned or professional practice operated by the state officer,
2026 IN 1022—LS 6288/DI 149


candidate, or the employee or that individual's spouse:
(A) The name of the sole proprietorship or professional
practice.
(B) The nature of the business.
(C) Whether any clients are known to have had a business
relationship with the agency of the state officer or employee or
the office sought by the candidate.
(D) The name of any client or customer from whom the state
officer, candidate, employee, or that individual's spouse
received more than thirty-three percent (33%) of the state
officer's, candidate's, employee's, or that individual's spouse's
nonstate income in a year.
(5) The name of any partnership of which the state officer,
candidate, or the employee or that individual's spouse is a member
and the nature of the partnership's business.
(6) The name of any corporation (other than a church) of which
the state officer, candidate, or the employee or that individual's
spouse is an officer or a director and the nature of the
corporation's business.
(7) The name of any corporation in which the state officer,
candidate, or the employee or that individual's spouse or
unemancipated children own stock or stock options having a fair
market value in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
However, if the stock is held in a blind trust, the name of the
administrator of the trust must be disclosed on the statement
instead of the name of the corporation. A time or demand deposit
in a financial institution or insurance policy need not be listed.
(8) The name and address of the most recent former employer.
(9) Additional information that the person making the disclosure
chooses to include.
Any such state officer, candidate, or employee may file an amended
statement upon discovery of additional information required to be
reported.
(d) A person who:
(1) fails to file a statement required by rule or this section in a
timely manner; or
(2) files a deficient statement;
upon a majority vote of the commission, is subject to a civil penalty at
a rate of not more than ten dollars ($10) for each day the statement
remains delinquent or deficient. The maximum penalty under this
subsection is one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(e) A person who intentionally or knowingly files a false statement
2026 IN 1022—LS 6288/DI 149


commits a Class A infraction.
2026 IN 1022—LS 6288/DI 149